Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6037
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-6008 to 71-6037 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Nursing Home Act.

Laws 1983, LB 235, § 30;

Laws 1986, LB 782, § 6;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 128.